Massachusetts, session 194th, H1304.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34A of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 102 the word “twenty” and inserting
in place thereof the word “fifty” and by striking out in line 104 the word “forty” and inserting in
place thereof the word “one hundred”.
SECTION 2. Section 34O of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 17 the word “five” and inserting in
place thereof the word “thirty”.
of 1